Florida, session 2026, HB381.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
107
108 Section 1. Section 494.00123, Florida Statutes, is created
109 to read:
110 494.00123 Information security programs; cybersecurity
111 event investigations.—
112 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
113 (a) "Customer" means a person who seeks to obtain or who
114 obtains or has obtained a financial product or service from a
115 licensee.
116 (b) "Customer information" means any record containing
117 nonpublic personal information about a customer of a financial
118 transaction, whether on paper, electronic, or in other forms,
119 which is handled or maintained by or on behalf of the licensee
120 or its affiliates.
121 (c) "Cybersecurity event" means an event resulting in
122 unauthorized access to, or disruption or misuse of, an
123 information system, information stored on such information
124 system, or customer information held in physical form.
125 (d) "Financial product or service" means any product or
Page 5 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
126 service offered by a licensee under this chapter.
127 (e) "Information security program" means the
128 administrative, technical, or physical safeguards used to
129 access, collect, distribute, process, protect, store, use,
130 transmit, dispose of, or otherwise handle customer information.
131 (f) "Information system" means a discrete set of
132 electronic information resources organized for the collection,
133 processing, maintenance, use, sharing, dissemination, or
134 disposition of electronic information, as well as any
135 specialized system such as an industrial process control system,
136 telephone switching and private branch exchange system, or
137 environmental control system, which contain customer information
138 or which are connected to a system that contains customer
139 information.
140 (g) "Licensee" means a person licensed under this chapter.
141 (h)1. "Nonpublic personal information" means:
142 a. Personally identifiable financial information; and
143 b. Any list, description, or other grouping of customers
144 that is derived using any personally identifiable financial
145 information that is not publicly available, such as account
146 numbers, including any list of individuals' names and street
147 addresses that is derived, in whole or in part, using personally
148 identifiable financial information that is not publicly
149 available.
150 2. The term does not include:
Page 6 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
151 a. Publicly available information, except as included on a
152 list, description, or other grouping of customers described in
153 sub-subparagraph 1.b.;
154 b. Any list, description, or other grouping of consumers,
155 or any publicly available information pertaining to such list,
156 description, or other grouping of consumers, which is derived
157 without using any personally identifiable financial information
158 that is not publicly available; or
159 c. Any list of individuals' names and addresses that
160 contains only publicly available information, is not derived, in
161 whole or in part, using personally identifiable financial
162 information that is not publicly available, and is not disclosed
163 in a manner that indicates that any of the individuals on the
164 list is a customer of a licensee.
165 3. As used in this paragraph, the term:
166 a.(I) "Personally identifiable financial information"
167 means any information that:
168 (A) A customer provides to a licensee to obtain a
169 financial product or service, such as information that a
170 customer provides to a licensee on an application to obtain a
171 loan or other financial product or service;
172 (B) A licensee receives about a consumer that is obtained
173 during or as a result of any transaction involving a financial
174 product or service between the licensee and the customer, such
175 as information collected through an information-collecting
Page 7 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
176 device from a web server; or
177 (C) A licensee otherwise obtains about a customer in
178 connection with providing a financial product or service to the
179 customer, such as the fact that an individual is or has been one
180 of the licensee's customers or has obtained a financial product
181 or service from the licensee.
182 (II) The term "personally identifiable financial
183 information" does not include:
184 (A) A list of names and addresses of customers of an
185 entity that is not a financial institution; or
186 (B) Information that does not identify a customer, such as
187 blind data or aggregate information that does not contain
188 personal identifiers such as account numbers, names, or
189 addresses.
190 b.(I) "Publicly available information" means any
191 information that a licensee has a reasonable basis to believe is
192 lawfully made available to the general public from:
193 (A) Federal, state, or local government records, such as
194 government real estate records or security interest filings;
195 (B) Widely distributed media, such as information from a
196 telephone records repository or directory, a television or radio
197 program, a newspaper, a social media platform, or a website that
198 is available to the general public on an unrestricted basis. A
199 website is not restricted merely because an Internet service
200 provider or a site operator requires a fee or a password, so
Page 8 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
201 long as access is available to the general public; or
202 (C) Disclosures to the general public which are required
203 to be made by federal, state, or local law.
204 (II) As used in this sub-subparagraph, the term
205 "reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the
206 general public" relating to any information means that the
207 person has taken steps to determine:
208 (A) That the information is of the type that is available
209 to the general public, such as information included on the
210 public record in the jurisdiction where the mortgage would be
211 recorded; and
212 (B) Whether an individual can direct that the information
213 not be made available to the general public and, if so, the
214 customer to whom the information relates has not done so, such
215 as when a telephone number is listed in a telephone directory
216 and the customer has informed the licensee that the telephone
217 number is not unlisted.
218 (i) "Third-party service provider" means a person, other
219 than a licensee, which contracts with a licensee to maintain,
220 process, or store nonpublic personal information, or is
221 otherwise permitted access to nonpublic personal information
222 through its provision of services to a licensee.
223 (2) INFORMATION SECURITY PROGRAM.—
224 (a) Each licensee shall develop, implement, and maintain a
225 comprehensive written information security program that contains
Page 9 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
226 administrative, technical, and physical safeguards for the
227 protection of the licensee's information system and nonpublic
228 personal information.
229 (b) Each licensee shall ensure that the information
230 security program meets all of the following criteria:
231 1. Be commensurate with the following measures:
232 a. Size and complexity of the licensee.
233 b. Nature and scope of the licensee's activities,
234 including the licensee's use of third-party service providers.
235 c. Sensitivity of nonpublic personal information that is
236 used by the licensee or that is in the licensee's possession,
237 custody, or control.
238 2. Be designed to do all of the following:
239 a. Protect the security and confidentiality of nonpublic
240 personal information and the security of the licensee's
241 information system.
242 b. Protect against threats or hazards to the security or
243 integrity of nonpublic personal information and the licensee's
244 information system.
245 c. Protect against unauthorized access to or the use of
246 nonpublic personal information and minimize the likelihood of
247 harm to any customer.
248 3. Define and periodically reevaluate the retention
249 schedule and the mechanism for the destruction of nonpublic
250 personal information if retention is no longer necessary for the
Page 10 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
251 licensee's business operations or is no longer required by
252 applicable law.
253 4. Regularly test and monitor systems and procedures for
254 the detection of actual and attempted attacks on, or intrusions
255 into, the licensee's information system.
256 5. Be monitored, evaluated, and adjusted, as necessary, to
257 meet all of the following requirements:
258 a. Determine whether the licensee's information security
259 program is consistent with relevant changes in technology.
260 b. Confirm the licensee's information security program
261 accounts for the sensitivity of nonpublic personal information.
262 c. Identify changes that may be necessary to the
263 licensee's information system.
264 d. Eliminate any internal or external threats to nonpublic
265 personal information.
266 e. Amend the licensee's information security program for
267 any of the licensee's changing business arrangements, including,
268 but not limited to, mergers and acquisitions, alliances and
269 joint ventures, and outsourcing arrangements.
270 (c)1. As part of a licensee's information security
271 program, the licensee shall establish a written incident
272 response plan designed to promptly respond to, and recover from,
273 a cybersecurity event that compromises:
274 a. The confidentiality, integrity, or availability of
275 nonpublic personal information in the licensee's possession;
Page 11 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
276 b. The licensee's information system; or
277 c. The continuing functionality of any aspect of the
278 licensee's operations.
279 2. The written incident response plan must address all of
280 the following:
281 a. The licensee's internal process for responding to a
282 cybersecurity event.
283 b. The goals of the licensee's incident response plan.
284 c. The assignment of clear roles, responsibilities, and
285 levels of decisionmaking authority for the licensee's personnel
286 that participate in the incident response plan.
287 d. External communications, internal communications, and
288 information sharing related to a cybersecurity event.
289 e. The identification of remediation requirements for
290 weaknesses identified in information systems and associated
291 controls.
292 f. The documentation and reporting regarding cybersecurity
293 events and related incident response activities.
294 g. The evaluation and revision of the incident response
295 plan, as appropriate, following a cybersecurity event.
296 h. The process by which notice must be given as required
297 under subsection (4) and s. 501.171(3) and (4).
298 (d)1. This section does not apply to a licensee that has
299 fewer than:
300 a. Twenty individuals on its workforce, including
Page 12 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
301 employees and independent contractors; or
302 b. Five hundred customers during a calendar year.
303 2. A licensee that no longer qualifies for exemption under
304 subparagraph 1. has 180 calendar days to comply with this
305 section after the date of the disqualification.
306 (e) Each licensee shall maintain a copy of the information
307 security program for a minimum of 5 years and shall make it
308 available to the office upon request or as part of an
309 examination.
310 (3) CYBERSECURITY EVENT INVESTIGATION.—
311 (a) If a licensee discovers that a cybersecurity event has
312 occurred or that a cybersecurity event may have occurred, the
313 licensee, or an outside vendor or third-party service provider
314 that the licensee has designated to act on its behalf, shall
315 conduct a prompt investigation of the cybersecurity event.
316 (b) During the investigation, the licensee, or the outside
317 vendor or third-party service provider that the licensee has
318 designated to act on its behalf, shall, at a minimum, determine
319 as much of the following as possible:
320 1. Confirm that a cybersecurity event has occurred.
321 2. Identify the date that the cybersecurity event first
322 occurred.
323 3. Assess the nature and scope of the cybersecurity event.
324 4. Identify all nonpublic personal information that may
325 have been compromised by the cybersecurity event.
Page 13 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
326 5. Perform or oversee reasonable measures to restore the
327 security of any compromised information system in order to
328 prevent further unauthorized acquisition, release, or use of
329 nonpublic personal information that is in the licensee's,
330 outside vendor's, or third-party service provider's possession,
331 custody, or control.
332 (c) If a licensee learns that a cybersecurity event has
333 occurred, or may have occurred, in an information system
334 maintained by a third-party service provider of the licensee,
335 the licensee shall complete an investigation in compliance with
336 this section or confirm and document that the third-party
337 service provider has completed an investigation in compliance
338 with this section.
339 (d) A licensee shall maintain all records and
340 documentation related to the licensee's investigation of a
341 cybersecurity event for a minimum of 5 years after the date of
342 the cybersecurity event and shall produce the records and
343 documentation to the office upon request.
344 (4) NOTICE TO OFFICE OF SECURITY BREACH.—
345 (a) Each licensee shall provide notice to the office of
346 any breach of security affecting 500 or more individuals in this
347 state at a time and in the manner prescribed by commission rule.
348 (b) Each licensee shall, upon the office's request,
349 provide a quarterly update of a cybersecurity event
350 investigation under subsection (3) until conclusion of the
Page 14 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
351 investigation.
352 (5) CONSTRUCTION.—This section may not be construed to
353 relieve a covered entity from complying with s. 501.171. To the
354 extent a licensee is a covered entity, as defined in s.
355 501.171(1), the licensee remains subject to s. 501.171.
356 (6) RULES.—The commission may adopt rules to administer
357 this section, including rules that allow a licensee that is in
358 full compliance with the Federal Trade Commission's Standards
359 for Safeguarding Customer Information, 16 C.F.R. part 314, to be
360 deemed in compliance with subsection (2).
361 Section 2. Paragraph (z) is added to subsection (1) of
362 section 494.00255, Florida Statutes, to read:
363 494.00255 Administrative penalties and fines; license
364 violations.—
365 (1) Each of the following acts constitutes a ground for
366 which the disciplinary actions specified in subsection (2) may
367 be taken against a person licensed or required to be licensed
368 under part II or part III of this chapter:
369 (z) Failure to comply with the notification requirements
370 in s. 501.171(3) and (4).
371 Section 3. Subsections (28) through (36) of section
372 517.021, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (29)
373 through (37), respectively, subsection (20) is amended, and a
374 new subsection (28) is added to that section, to read:
375 517.021 Definitions.—When used in this chapter, unless the
Page 15 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
376 context otherwise indicates, the following terms have the
377 following respective meanings:
378 (20)(a) "Investment adviser" means a person, other than an
379 associated person of an investment adviser or a federal covered
380 adviser, that receives compensation, directly or indirectly, and
381 engages for all or part of the person's time, directly or
382 indirectly, or through publications or writings, in the business
383 of advising others as to the value of securities or as to the
384 advisability of investments in, purchasing of, or selling of
385 securities.
386 (b) The term does not include any of the following:
387 1. A dealer or an associated person of a dealer whose
388 performance of services in paragraph (a) is solely incidental to
389 the conduct of the dealer's or associated person's business as a
390 dealer and who does not receive special compensation for those
391 services.
392 2. A licensed practicing attorney or certified public
393 accountant whose performance of such services is solely
394 incidental to the practice of the attorney's or accountant's
395 profession.
396 3. A bank authorized to do business in this state.
397 4. A bank holding company as defined in the Bank Holding
398 Company Act of 1956, as amended, authorized to do business in
399 this state.
400 5. A trust company having trust powers, as defined in s.
Page 16 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
401 658.12, which it is authorized to exercise in this state, which
402 trust company renders or performs investment advisory services
403 in a fiduciary capacity incidental to the exercise of its trust
404 powers.
405 6. A person that renders investment advice exclusively to
406 insurance or investment companies.
407 7. A person:
408 a. Without a place of business in this state if the person
409 has had that, during the preceding 12 months, has fewer than six
410 clients who are residents of this state.
411 b. With a place of business in this state if the person
412 has had, during the preceding 12 months, fewer than six clients
413 who are residents of this state and no clients who are not
414 residents of this state.
415
416 As used in this subparagraph, the term "client" has the same
417 meaning as provided in Securities and Exchange Commission Rule
418 222-2 275.222-2, 17 C.F.R. s. 275.222-2, as amended.
419 8. A federal covered adviser.
420 9. The United States, a state, or any political
421 subdivision of a state, or any agency, authority, or
422 instrumentality of any such entity; a business entity that is
423 wholly owned directly or indirectly by such a governmental
424 entity; or any officer, agent, or employee of any such
425 governmental or business entity who is acting within the scope
Page 17 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
426 of his or her official duties.
427 10. A family office as defined in Securities and Exchange
428 Commission Rule 202(a)(11)(G)-1(b) and (d) under the Investment
429 Advisers Act of 1940, 17 C.F.R. s. 275. 202(a)(11)(G)-1(b) and
430 (d), as amended, without giving regard to paragraph 1(a) or
431 paragraph 1(c) of that rule.
432 (28) "Place of business" of an investment adviser means an
433 office at which the investment adviser regularly provides
434 investment advisory services, solicits, meets with, or otherwise
435 communicates with clients; and any other location that is held
436 out to the general public as a location at which the investment
437 adviser provides investment advisory services, solicits, meets
438 with, or otherwise communicates with clients.
439 Section 4. Section 559.952, Florida Statutes, is amended
440 to read:
441 559.952 Financial Technology Sandbox.—
442 (1) SHORT TITLE.—This section may be cited as the
443 "Financial Technology Sandbox."
444 (2) CREATION OF THE FINANCIAL TECHNOLOGY SANDBOX.—There is
445 created the Financial Technology Sandbox within the Office of
446 Financial Regulation to allow financial technology innovators to
447 test new products and services in a supervised, flexible
448 regulatory sandbox using exceptions to specified general law and
449 waivers of specified provisions of general law and the
450 corresponding rule requirements under defined conditions. The
Page 18 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
451 creation of a supervised, flexible regulatory sandbox provides a
452 welcoming business environment for technology innovators and may
453 lead to significant business growth.
454 (3) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
455 (a) "Business entity" means any corporation, limited
456 liability company, or trust that may or may not be fictitiously
457 named and that does business in this state a domestic
458 corporation or other organized domestic entity with a physical
459 presence, other than that of a registered office or agent or
460 virtual mailbox, in this state.
461 (b) "Commission" means the Financial Services Commission.
462 (c) "Consumer" means a person in this state, whether a
463 natural person or a business organization, who purchases, uses,
464 receives, or enters into an agreement to purchase, use, or
465 receive a an innovative financial product or service made
466 available through the Financial Technology Sandbox.
467 (d) "Control person" means an individual, a partnership, a
468 corporation, a trust, or other organization that possesses the
469 power, directly or indirectly, to direct the management or
470 policies of a company, whether through ownership of securities,
471 by contract, or through other means. A person is presumed to
472 control a company if, with respect to a particular company, that
473 person:
474 1. Is a director, a general partner, or an officer
475 exercising executive responsibility or having similar status or
Page 19 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
476 functions;
477 2. Directly or indirectly may vote 10 percent or more of a
478 class of a voting security or sell or direct the sale of 10
479 percent or more of a class of voting securities; or
480 3. In the case of a partnership, may receive upon
481 dissolution or has contributed 10 percent or more of the
482 capital.
483 (e) "Corresponding rule requirements" means the commission
484 rules, or portions thereof, which implement the general laws
485 enumerated in paragraph (4)(a).
486 (f) "Financial product or service" means a product or
487 service related to a consumer finance loan, as defined in s.
488 516.01, or credit, banking services, money transmission, or
489 securities transactions a money transmitter or payment
490 instrument seller, as those terms are defined in s. 560.103,
491 including mediums of exchange that are in electronic or digital
492 form, which is subject to the general laws enumerated in
493 paragraph (4)(a) and corresponding rule requirements and which
494 is under the jurisdiction of the office.
495 (g) "Financial Technology Sandbox" means the program
496 created by this section which allows a licensee to make a an
497 innovative financial product or service available to consumers
498 during a sandbox period through waivers of exceptions to general
499 laws and waivers of corresponding rule requirements.
500 (h) "Innovative" means new or emerging technology, or new
Page 20 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
501 uses of existing technology, which provide a product, service,
502 business model, or delivery mechanism to the public and which
503 are not known to have a comparable offering in this state
504 outside the Financial Technology Sandbox.
505 (h)(i) "Licensee" means a business entity that has been
506 approved by the office to participate in the Financial
507 Technology Sandbox.
508 (i)(j) "Office" means, unless the context clearly
509 indicates otherwise, the Office of Financial Regulation.
510 (j)(k) "Sandbox period" means the initial 24-month period
511 in which the office has authorized a licensee to make a an
512 innovative financial product or service available to consumers,
513 and any extension granted pursuant to subsection (7).
514 (4) WAIVERS OF EXCEPTIONS TO GENERAL LAW AND CORRESPONDING
515 WAIVERS OF RULE REQUIREMENTS.—
516 (a) Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of a
517 Financial Technology Sandbox application, the office may grant
518 an applicant during a sandbox period a waiver of a requirement,
519 or a portion thereof, imposed by a general law or rule in any
520 following chapter, or part thereof, if all of the conditions in
521 paragraph (b) are met following provisions and corresponding
522 rule requirements are not applicable to the licensee during the
523 sandbox period:
524 1. Chapter 516, Consumer Finance.
525 2. Chapter 517, Securities Transactions.
Page 21 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
526 3. Chapter 520, Retail Installment Sales.
527 4. Chapter 537, Title Loans.
528 5. Part I or part II of chapter 560, General Provisions of
529 Money Services Businesses or Payment Instruments and Funds
530 Transmission.
531 6. Chapter 655, Financial Institutions Generally.
532 7. Chapter 657, Credit Unions.
533 8. Chapter 658, Banks and Trust Companies.
534 9. Chapter 660, Trust Business.
535 10. Chapter 662, Family Trust Companies.
536 11. Chapter 663, International Banking.
537 1. Section 516.03(1), except for the application fee, the
538 investigation fee, the requirement to provide the social
539 security numbers of control persons, evidence of liquid assets
540 of at least $25,000 or documents satisfying the requirements of
541 s. 516.05(10), and the office's authority to investigate the
542 applicant's background. The office may prorate the license
543 renewal fee for an extension granted under subsection (7).
544 2. Section 516.05(1) and (2), except that the office shall
545 investigate the applicant's background.
546 3. Section 560.109, only to the extent that the section
547 requires the office to examine a licensee at least once every 5
548 years.
549 4. Section 560.118(2).
550 5. Section 560.125(1), only to the extent that the
Page 22 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
551 subsection would prohibit a licensee from engaging in the
552 business of a money transmitter or payment instrument seller
553 during the sandbox period.
554 6. Section 560.125(2), only to the extent that the
555 subsection would prohibit a licensee from appointing an
556 authorized vendor during the sandbox period. Any authorized
557 vendor of such a licensee during the sandbox period remains
558 liable to the holder or remitter.
559 7. Section 560.128.
560 8. Section 560.141, except for s. 560.141(1)(a)1., 3., 7.-
561 10. and (b), (c), and (d).
562 9. Section 560.142(1) and (2), except that the office may
563 prorate, but may not entirely eliminate, the license renewal
564 fees in s. 560.143 for an extension granted under subsection
565 (7).
566 10. Section 560.143(2), only to the extent necessary for
567 proration of the renewal fee under subparagraph 9.
568 11. Section 560.204(1), only to the extent that the
569 subsection would prohibit a licensee from engaging in, or
570 advertising that it engages in, the activity of a payment
571 instrument seller or money transmitter during the sandbox
572 period.
573 12. Section 560.205(2).
574 13. Section 560.208(2).
575 14. Section 560.209, only to the extent that the office
Page 23 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
576 may modify, but may not entirely eliminate, the net worth,
577 corporate surety bond, and collateral deposit amounts required
578 under that section. The modified amounts must be in such lower
579 amounts that the office determines to be commensurate with the
580 factors under paragraph (5)(c) and the maximum number of
581 consumers authorized to receive the financial product or service
582 under this section.
583 (b) The office may grant an applicant during a sandbox
584 period a waiver of a requirement, or a portion thereof, imposed
585 by a general law or rule in any chapter enumerated in paragraph
586 (a) if all of the following conditions are met: approve a
587 Financial Technology Sandbox application if one or more of the
588 general laws enumerated in paragraph (a) currently prevent the
589 innovative financial product or service from being made
590 available to consumers and if all other requirements of this
591 section are met.
592 1. The general law or rule does not currently authorize
593 the financial product or service to be made available to
594 consumers.
595 2. The waiver is not broader than necessary to accomplish
596 the purposes and standards specified in this section, as
597 determined by the office.
598 3. Any provision relating to the liability of an
599 incorporator, director, or officer of the applicant is not
600 eligible for a waiver.
Page 24 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
601 (c) A licensee may conduct business through electronic
602 means, including through the Internet or a software application.
603 (5) FINANCIAL TECHNOLOGY SANDBOX APPLICATION; STANDARDS
604 FOR APPROVAL.—
605 (a) Before filing an application for licensure under this
606 section, a substantially affected person may seek a declaratory
607 statement pursuant to s. 120.565 regarding the applicability of
608 a statute, a rule, or an agency order to the petitioner's
609 particular set of circumstances or a variance or waiver of a
610 rule pursuant to s. 120.542.
611 (b) Before making a an innovative financial product or
612 service available to consumers in the Financial Technology
613 Sandbox, a business entity must file with the office an
614 application for licensure under the Financial Technology
615 Sandbox. The commission shall, by rule, prescribe the form and
616 manner of the application and how the office will evaluate and
617 apply each of the factors specified in paragraph (c).
618 1. The application must specify each general law
619 enumerated in paragraph (4)(a) which currently prevents the
620 innovative financial product or service from being made
621 available to consumers and the reasons why those provisions of
622 general law prevent the innovative financial product or service
623 from being made available to consumers.
624 2. The application must contain sufficient information for
625 the office to evaluate the factors specified in paragraph (c).
Page 25 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
626 3. An application submitted on behalf of a business entity
627 must include evidence that the business entity has authorized
628 the person to submit the application on behalf of the business
629 entity intending to make a an innovative financial product or
630 service available to consumers.
631 4. The application must specify the maximum number of
632 consumers, which may not exceed the number of consumers
633 specified in paragraph (f), to whom the applicant proposes to
634 provide the innovative financial product or service.
635 5. The application must include a proposed draft of the
636 statement or statements meeting the requirements of paragraph
637 (6)(b) which the applicant proposes to provide to consumers.
638 (c) The office shall approve or deny in writing a
639 Financial Technology Sandbox application within 60 days after
640 receiving the completed application. The office and the
641 applicant may jointly agree to extend the time beyond 60 days.
642 Consistent with this section, the office may impose conditions
643 on any approval. In deciding whether to approve or deny an
644 application for licensure, the office must consider each of the
645 following:
646 1. The nature of the innovative financial product or
647 service proposed to be made available to consumers in the
648 Financial Technology Sandbox, including all relevant technical
649 details.
650 2. The potential risk to consumers and the methods that
Page 26 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
651 will be used to protect consumers and resolve complaints during
652 the sandbox period.
653 2.3. The business plan proposed by the applicant,
654 including company information, market analysis, and financial
655 projections or pro forma financial statements, and evidence of
656 the financial viability of the applicant.
657 4. Whether the applicant has the necessary personnel,
658 adequate financial and technical expertise, and a sufficient
659 plan to test, monitor, and assess the innovative financial
660 product or service.
661 3.5. Whether any control person of the applicant,
662 regardless of adjudication, has pled no contest to, has been
663 convicted or found guilty of, or is currently under
664 investigation for fraud, a state or federal securities
665 violation, a property-based offense, or a crime involving moral
666 turpitude or dishonest dealing, in which case the application to
667 the Financial Technology Sandbox must be denied.
668 4.6. A copy of the disclosures that will be provided to
669 consumers under paragraph (6)(b).
670 5.7. The financial responsibility of the applicant and any
671 control person, including whether the applicant or any control
672 person has a history of unpaid liens, unpaid judgments, or other
673 general history of nonpayment of legal debts, including, but not
674 limited to, having been the subject of a petition for bankruptcy
675 under the United States Bankruptcy Code within the past 7
Page 27 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
676 calendar years.
677 6.8. Any other factor that the office determines to be
678 relevant.
679 (d) The office may not approve an application if:
680 1. The applicant had a prior Financial Technology Sandbox
681 application that was approved and that related to a
682 substantially similar financial product or service;
683 2. Any control person of the applicant was substantially
684 involved in the development, operation, or management with
685 another Financial Technology Sandbox applicant whose application
686 was approved and whose application related to a substantially
687 similar financial product or service; or
688 3. The applicant or any control person has failed to
689 affirmatively demonstrate financial responsibility.
690 (e) Upon approval of an application, the office shall
691 notify the licensee of the specific that the licensee is exempt
692 from the provisions of general law enumerated in paragraph
693 (4)(a) and the corresponding rule requirements that are waived
694 during the sandbox period. The office shall post on its website
695 notice of the approval of the application, a summary of the
696 innovative financial product or service, and the contact
697 information of the licensee.
698 (f) The office, on a case-by-case basis, may shall specify
699 the maximum number of consumers authorized to receive a an
700 innovative financial product or service, after consultation with
Page 28 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
701 the Financial Technology Sandbox applicant. The office may not
702 authorize more than 15,000 consumers to receive the financial
703 product or service until the licensee has filed the first report
704 required under subsection (8). After the filing of that report,
705 if the licensee demonstrates adequate financial capitalization,
706 risk management processes, and management oversight, the office
707 may authorize up to 25,000 consumers to receive the financial
708 product or service.
709 (g) A licensee has a continuing obligation to promptly
710 inform the office of any material change to the information
711 provided under paragraph (b).
712 (h) The following information provided to and held by the
713 office in a Financial Technology Sandbox application under this
714 subsection is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
715 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution:
716 1. The reasons why a general law enumerated in paragraph
717 (4)(a) prevents the innovative financial product or service from
718 being made available to consumers.
719 2. The information provided for evaluation of the factors
720 specified in subparagraphs (c)1. and 2. 3.
721 3. The information provided for evaluation of whether the
722 applicant has a sufficient plan to test, monitor, and assess the
723 innovative financial product or service, under subparagraph
724 (c)4.
725
Page 29 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
726 However, the confidential and exempt information may be released
727 to appropriate state and federal agencies for the purposes of
728 investigation. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to
729 prevent the office from disclosing a summary of the innovative
730 financial product or service.
731 (6) OPERATION OF THE FINANCIAL TECHNOLOGY SANDBOX.—
732 (a) A licensee may make a an innovative financial product
733 or service available to consumers during the sandbox period.
734 (b)1. Before a consumer purchases, uses, receives, or
735 enters into an agreement to purchase, use, or receive a an
736 innovative financial product or service through the Financial
737 Technology Sandbox, the licensee must provide a written
738 statement of all of the following to the consumer:
739 a. The name and contact information of the licensee.
740 b. That the financial product or service has been
741 authorized to be made available to consumers for a temporary
742 period by the office, under the laws of this state.
743 c. That the state does not endorse the financial product
744 or service.
745 d. That the financial product or service is undergoing
746 testing, may not function as intended, and may entail financial
747 risk.
748 e. That the licensee is not immune from civil liability
749 for any losses or damages caused by the financial product or
750 service.
Page 30 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
751 f. The expected end date of the sandbox period.
752 g. The contact information for the office and notification
753 that suspected legal violations, complaints, or other comments
754 related to the financial product or service may be submitted to
755 the office.
756 h. Any other statements or disclosures required by rule of
757 the commission which are necessary to further the purposes of
758 this section.
759 2. The written statement under subparagraph 1. must
760 contain an acknowledgment from the consumer, which must be
761 retained for the duration of the sandbox period by the licensee.
762 (c) The office may enter into an agreement with a state,
763 federal, or foreign regulatory agency to allow licensees under
764 the Financial Technology Sandbox to make their products or
765 services available in other jurisdictions. The commission shall
766 adopt rules to implement this paragraph.
767 (d) The office may examine the records of a licensee at
768 any time, with or without prior notice.
769 (7) EXTENSION AND CONCLUSION OF SANDBOX PERIOD.—
770 (a) A licensee may apply for one extension of the initial
771 24-month sandbox period for 12 additional months for a purpose
772 specified in subparagraph (b)1. or subparagraph (b)2. A complete
773 application for an extension must be filed with the office at
774 least 90 days before the conclusion of the initial sandbox
775 period. The office shall approve or deny the application for
Page 31 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
776 extension in writing at least 35 days before the conclusion of
777 the initial sandbox period. In determining whether to approve or
778 deny an application for extension of the sandbox period, the
779 office must, at a minimum, consider the current status of the
780 factors previously considered under paragraph (5)(c).
781 (b) An application for an extension under paragraph (a)
782 must cite one of the following reasons as the basis for the
783 application and must provide all relevant supporting
784 information:
785 1. Amendments to general law or rules are necessary to
786 offer the innovative financial product or service in this state
787 permanently.
788 2. An application for a license that is required in order
789 to offer the innovative financial product or service in this
790 state permanently has been filed with the office and approval is
791 pending.
792 (c) At least 30 days before the conclusion of the initial
793 24-month sandbox period or the extension, whichever is later, a
794 licensee shall provide written notification to consumers
795 regarding the conclusion of the initial sandbox period or the
796 extension and may not make the financial product or service
797 available to any new consumers after the conclusion of the
798 initial sandbox period or the extension, whichever is later,
799 until legal authority outside of the Financial Technology
800 Sandbox exists for the licensee to make the financial product or
Page 32 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
801 service available to consumers. After the conclusion of the
802 sandbox period or the extension, whichever is later, the
803 business entity formerly licensed under the Financial Technology
804 Sandbox may:
805 1. Collect and receive money owed to the business entity
806 or pay money owed by the business entity, based on agreements
807 with consumers made before the conclusion of the sandbox period
808 or the extension.
809 2. Take necessary legal action.
810 3. Take other actions authorized by commission rule which
811 are not inconsistent with this section.
812 (8) REPORT.—A licensee shall submit a report to the office
813 twice a year as prescribed by commission rule. The report must,
814 at a minimum, include financial reports and the number of
815 consumers who have received the financial product or service.
816 (9) CONSTRUCTION.—A business entity whose Financial
817 Technology Sandbox application is approved under this section:
818 (a) Shall be deemed to possess an appropriate license
819 under any general law requiring state licensure or
820 authorization.
821 (b) Does not obtain a property right.
822 (c) Is not, nor is its financial product or service,
823 endorsed by this state, nor is this state subject to liability
824 for losses or damages caused by the financial product or
825 service.
Page 33 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
826 (a) Is licensed under chapter 516, chapter 560, or both
827 chapters 516 and 560, as applicable to the business entity's
828 activities.
829 (b) Is subject to any provision of chapter 516 or chapter
830 560 not specifically excepted under paragraph (4)(a), as
831 applicable to the business entity's activities, and must comply
832 with such provisions.
833 (c) May not engage in activities authorized under part III
834 of chapter 560, notwithstanding s. 560.204(2).
835 (10) VIOLATIONS AND PENALTIES.—
836 (a) A licensee who makes a an innovative financial product
837 or service available to consumers in the Financial Technology
838 Sandbox remains subject to:
839 1. Civil damages for acts and omissions arising from or
840 related to any innovative financial product or services provided
841 or made available by the licensee or relating to this section.
842 2. All criminal and consumer protection laws and any other
843 statute not specifically excepted under paragraph (4)(a).
844 (b)1. The office may, by order, revoke or suspend a
845 licensee's approval to participate in the Financial Technology
846 Sandbox if:
847 a. The licensee has violated or refused to comply with
848 this section, any statute not specifically excepted under
849 paragraph (4)(a), a rule of the commission that has not been
850 waived, an order of the office, or a condition placed by the
Page 34 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
851 office on the approval of the licensee's Financial Technology
852 Sandbox application;
853 b. A fact or condition exists that, if it had existed or
854 become known at the time that the Financial Technology Sandbox
855 application was pending, would have warranted denial of the
856 application or the imposition of material conditions;
857 c. A material error, false statement, misrepresentation,
858 or material omission was made in the Financial Technology
859 Sandbox application; or
860 d. After consultation with the licensee, the office
861 determines that continued testing of the innovative financial
862 product or service would:
863 (I) Be likely to harm consumers; or
864 (II) No longer serve the purposes of this section because
865 of the financial or operational failure of the financial product
866 or service.
867 2. Written notice of a revocation or suspension order made
868 under subparagraph 1. must be served using any means authorized
869 by law. If the notice relates to a suspension, the notice must
870 include any condition or remedial action that the licensee must
871 complete before the office lifts the suspension.
872 (c) The office may refer any suspected violation of law to
873 an appropriate state or federal agency for investigation,
874 prosecution, civil penalties, and other appropriate enforcement
875 action.
Page 35 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
876 (d) If service of process on a licensee is not feasible,
877 service on the office is deemed service on the licensee.
878 (11) RULES AND ORDERS.—
879 (a) The commission shall adopt rules to administer this
880 section before approving any application under this section.
881 (b) The office may issue all necessary orders to enforce
882 this section and may enforce these orders in accordance with
883 chapter 120 or in any court of competent jurisdiction. These
884 orders include, but are not limited to, orders for payment of
885 restitution for harm suffered by consumers as a result of a an
886 innovative financial product or service.
887 Section 5. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 560.114,
888 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
889 560.114 Disciplinary actions; penalties.—
890 (1) The following actions by a money services business, an
891 authorized vendor, or a affiliated party that was affiliated at
892 the time of commission of the actions constitute grounds for the
893 issuance of a cease and desist order; the issuance of a removal
894 order; the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license; or
895 taking any other action within the authority of the office
896 pursuant to this chapter:
897 (a) Failure to comply with any provision of this chapter
898 or related rule or order, or any written agreement entered into
899 with the office.
900 (b) Fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or gross negligence
Page 36 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
901 in any transaction by a money services business, regardless of
902 reliance thereon by, or damage to, a customer.
903 (c) Fraudulent misrepresentation, circumvention, or
904 concealment of any matter that must be stated or furnished to a
905 customer pursuant to this chapter, regardless of reliance
906 thereon by, or damage to, such customer.
907 (d) False, deceptive, or misleading advertising.
908 (e) Failure to maintain, preserve, keep available for
909 examination, and produce all books, accounts, files, or other
910 documents required by this chapter or related rules or orders,
911 by 31 C.F.R. ss. 1010.306, 1010.311, 1010.312, 1010.340,
912 1010.410, 1010.415, 1022.210, 1022.320, 1022.380, and 1022.410,
913 or by an agreement entered into with the office.
914 (f) Refusing to allow the examination or inspection of
915 books, accounts, files, or other documents by the office
916 pursuant to this chapter, or to comply with a subpoena issued by
917 the office.
918 (g) Failure to pay a judgment recovered in any court by a
919 claimant in an action arising out of a money transmission
920 transaction within 30 days after the judgment becomes final.
921 (h) Engaging in an act prohibited under s. 560.111 or s.
922 560.1115.
923 (i) Insolvency.
924 (j) Failure by a money services business to remove an
925 affiliated party after the office has issued and served upon the
Page 37 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
926 money services business a final order setting forth a finding
927 that the affiliated party has violated a provision of this
928 chapter.
929 (k) Making a material misstatement, misrepresentation, or
930 omission in an application for licensure, any amendment to such
931 application, or application for the appointment of an authorized
932 vendor.
933 (l) Committing any act that results in a license or its
934 equivalent, to practice any profession or occupation being
935 denied, suspended, revoked, or otherwise acted against by a
936 licensing authority in any jurisdiction.
937 (m) Being the subject of final agency action or its
938 equivalent, issued by an appropriate regulator, for engaging in
939 unlicensed activity as a money services business or deferred
940 presentment provider in any jurisdiction.
941 (n) Committing any act resulting in a license or its
942 equivalent to practice any profession or occupation being
943 denied, suspended, revoked, or otherwise acted against by a
944 licensing authority in any jurisdiction for a violation of 18
945 U.S.C. s. 1956, 18 U.S.C. s. 1957, 18 U.S.C. s. 1960, 31 U.S.C.
946 s. 5324, or any other law or rule of another state or of the
947 United States relating to a money services business, deferred
948 presentment provider, or usury that may cause the denial,
949 suspension, or revocation of a money services business or
950 deferred presentment provider license or its equivalent in such
Page 38 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
951 jurisdiction.
952 (o) Having been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty
953 or nolo contendere to, any felony or crime punishable by
954 imprisonment of 1 year or more under the law of any state or the
955 United States which involves fraud, moral turpitude, or
956 dishonest dealing, regardless of adjudication.
957 (p) Having been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty
958 or nolo contendere to, a crime under 18 U.S.C. s. 1956 or 31
959 U.S.C. s. 5318, s. 5322, or s. 5324, regardless of adjudication.
960 (q) Having been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty
961 or nolo contendere to, misappropriation, conversion, or unlawful
962 withholding of moneys belonging to others, regardless of
963 adjudication.
964 (r) Having been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty
965 or nolo contendere to, a violation of 31 C.F.R. chapter X, part
966 1022, regardless of adjudication.
967 (s)(r) Failure to inform the office in writing within 30
968 days after having pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or being
969 convicted of, any felony or crime punishable by imprisonment of
970 1 year or more under the law of any state or the United States,
971 or any crime involving fraud, moral turpitude, or dishonest
972 dealing.
973 (t)(s) Aiding, assisting, procuring, advising, or abetting
974 any person in violating a provision of this chapter or any order
975 or rule of the office or commission.
Page 39 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
976 (u)(t) Failure to pay any fee, charge, or cost imposed or
977 assessed under this chapter.
978 (v)(u) Failing to pay a fine assessed by the office within
979 30 days after the due date as stated in a final order.
980 (w)(v) Failure to pay any judgment entered by any court
981 within 30 days after the judgment becomes final.
982 (x)(w) Engaging or advertising engagement in the business
983 of a money services business or deferred presentment provider
984 without a license, unless exempted from licensure.
985 (y)(x) Payment to the office for a license or other fee,
986 charge, cost, or fine with a check or electronic transmission of
987 funds that is dishonored by the applicant's or licensee's
988 financial institution.
989 (z)(y) Violations of 31 C.F.R. ss. 1010.306, 1010.311,
990 1010.312, 1010.340, 1010.410, 1010.415, 1022.210, 1022.320,
991 1022.380, and 1022.410, and United States Treasury Interpretive
992 Release 2004-1.
993 (aa)(z) Any practice or conduct that creates the
994 likelihood of a material loss, insolvency, or dissipation of
995 assets of a money services business or otherwise materially
996 prejudices the interests of its customers.
997 (bb)(aa) Failure of a check casher to maintain a federally
998 insured depository account as required by s. 560.309.
999 (cc)(bb) Failure of a check casher to deposit into its own
1000 federally insured depository account any payment instrument
Page 40 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1001 cashed as required by s. 560.309.
1002 (dd)(cc) Violating any provision of the Military Lending
1003 Act, 10 U.S.C. s. 987, or the regulations adopted under that act
1004 in 32 C.F.R. part 232, in connection with a deferred presentment
1005 transaction conducted under part IV of this chapter.
1006 (ee) Failure to comply with the notification requirements
1007 in s. 501.171(3) and (4).
1008 (2) Pursuant to s. 120.60(6), The office shall issue an
1009 emergency order suspending may summarily suspend the license of
1010 a money services business if the office finds that a licensee
1011 poses an immediate, serious danger to the public health, safety,
1012 and welfare. A proceeding in which the office seeks the issuance
1013 of a final order for the summary suspension of a licensee shall
1014 be conducted by the commissioner of the office, or his or her
1015 designee, who shall issue such order. The following acts are
1016 deemed by the Legislature to constitute an immediate and serious
1017 danger to the public health, safety, and welfare, and the office
1018 shall may immediately suspend the license of a money services
1019 business without making any further findings of immediate
1020 danger, necessity, and procedural fairness if:
1021 (a) The money services business fails to provide to the
1022 office, upon written request, any of the records required by s.
1023 560.123, s. 560.1235, s. 560.211, or s. 560.310 or any rule
1024 adopted under those sections. The suspension may be rescinded if
1025 the licensee submits the requested records to the office.
Page 41 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1026 (b) The money services business fails to maintain a
1027 federally insured depository account as required by s.
1028 560.208(4) or s. 560.309.
1029 (c) A natural person required to be listed on the license
1030 application for a money services business pursuant to s.
1031 560.141(1)(a)3. is criminally charged with, or arrested for, a
1032 crime described in paragraph (1)(o), paragraph (1)(p), or
1033 paragraph(1)(q).
1034 Section 6. Section 560.1311, Florida Statutes, is created
1035 to read:
1036 560.1311 Information security programs; cybersecurity
1037 event investigations.—
1038 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
1039 (a) "Customer" means a person who seeks to obtain or who
1040 obtains or has obtained a financial product or service from a
1041 licensee.
1042 (b) "Customer information" means any record containing
1043 nonpublic personal information about a customer of a financial
1044 transaction, whether on paper, electronic, or in other forms,
1045 which is handled or maintained by or on behalf of the licensee
1046 or its affiliates.
1047 (c) "Cybersecurity event" means an event resulting in
1048 unauthorized access to, or disruption or misuse of, an
1049 information system, information stored on such information
1050 system, or customer information held in physical form.
Page 42 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1051 (d) "Financial product or service" means any product or
1052 service offered by a licensee under this chapter.
1053 (e) "Information security program" means the
1054 administrative, technical, or physical safeguards used to
1055 access, collect, distribute, process, protect, store, use,
1056 transmit, dispose of, or otherwise handle customer information.
1057 (f) "Information system" means a discrete set of
1058 electronic information resources organized for the collection,
1059 processing, maintenance, use, sharing, dissemination, or
1060 disposition of electronic information, as well as any
1061 specialized system such as an industrial process control system,
1062 telephone switching and private branch exchange system, or
1063 environmental control system, which contain customer information
1064 or which are connected to a system that contains customer
1065 information.
1066 (g)1. "Nonpublic personal information" means:
1067 a. Personally identifiable financial information; and
1068 b. Any list, description, or other grouping of customers
1069 that is derived using any personally identifiable financial
1070 information that is not publicly available, such as account
1071 numbers, including any list of individuals' names and street
1072 addresses that is derived, in whole or in part, using personally
1073 identifiable financial information that is not publicly
1074 available.
1075 2. The term does not include:
Page 43 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1076 a. Publicly available information, except as included on a
1077 list, description, or other grouping of customers described in
1078 sub-subparagraph 1.b.;
1079 b. Any list, description, or other grouping of consumers,
1080 or any publicly available information pertaining to such list,
1081 description, or other grouping of consumers, which is derived
1082 without using any personally identifiable financial information
1083 that is not publicly available; or
1084 c. Any list of individuals' names and addresses that
1085 contains only publicly available information, is not derived, in
1086 whole or in part, using personally identifiable financial
1087 information that is not publicly available, and is not disclosed
1088 in a manner that indicates that any of the individuals on the
1089 list is a customer of a licensee.
1090 3. As used in this paragraph, the term:
1091 a.(I) "Personally identifiable financial information"
1092 means any information that:
1093 (A) A customer provides to a licensee to obtain a
1094 financial product or service, such as information that a
1095 customer provides to a licensee on an application to obtain a
1096 loan or other financial product or service;
1097 (B) A licensee receives about a consumer that is obtained
1098 during or as a result of any transaction involving a financial
1099 product or service between the licensee and the customer, such
1100 as information collected through an information-collecting
Page 44 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1101 device from a web server; or
1102 (C) A licensee otherwise obtains about a customer in
1103 connection with providing a financial product or service to the
1104 customer, such as the fact that an individual is or has been one
1105 of the licensee's customers or has obtained a financial product
1106 or service from the licensee.
1107 (II) The term "personally identifiable financial
1108 information" does not include:
1109 (A) A list of names and addresses of customers of an
1110 entity that is not a financial institution; or
1111 (B) Information that does not identify a customer, such as
1112 blind data or aggregate information that does not contain
1113 personal identifiers such as account numbers, names, or
1114 addresses.
1115 b.(I) "Publicly available information" means any
1116 information that a licensee has a reasonable basis to believe is
1117 lawfully made available to the general public from:
1118 (A) Federal, state, or local government records, such as
1119 government real estate records or security interest filings;
1120 (B) Widely distributed media, such as information from a
1121 telephone records repository or directory, a television or radio
1122 program, a newspaper, a social media platform, or a website that
1123 is available to the general public on an unrestricted basis. A
1124 website is not restricted merely because an Internet service
1125 provider or a site operator requires a fee or a password, so
Page 45 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1126 long as access is available to the general public; or
1127 (C) Disclosures to the general public which are required
1128 to be made by federal, state, or local law.
1129 (II) As used in this sub-subparagraph, the term
1130 "reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the
1131 general public" relating to any information means that the
1132 person has taken steps to determine:
1133 (A) That the information is of the type that is available
1134 to the general public, such as information included on the
1135 public record in the jurisdiction where the mortgage would be
1136 recorded; and
1137 (B) Whether an individual can direct that the information
1138 not be made available to the general public and, if so, the
1139 customer to whom the information relates has not done so, such
1140 as when a telephone number is listed in a telephone directory
1141 and the customer has informed the licensee that the telephone
1142 number is not unlisted.
1143 (h) "Third-party service provider" means a person, other
1144 than a licensee, which contracts with a licensee to maintain,
1145 process, or store nonpublic personal information, or is
1146 otherwise permitted access to nonpublic personal information
1147 through its provision of services to a licensee.
1148 (2) INFORMATION SECURITY PROGRAM.—
1149 (a) Each licensee shall develop, implement, and maintain a
1150 comprehensive written information security program that contains
Page 46 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1151 administrative, technical, and physical safeguards for the
1152 protection of the licensee's information system and nonpublic
1153 personal information.
1154 (b) Each licensee shall ensure that the information
1155 security program meets all of the following criteria:
1156 1. Be commensurate with the following measures:
1157 a. Size and complexity of the licensee.
1158 b. Nature and scope of the licensee's activities,
1159 including the licensee's use of third-party service providers.
1160 c. Sensitivity of nonpublic personal information that is
1161 used by the licensee or that is in the licensee's possession,
1162 custody, or control.
1163 2. Be designed to do all of the following:
1164 a. Protect the security and confidentiality of nonpublic
1165 personal information and the security of the licensee's
1166 information system.
1167 b. Protect against threats or hazards to the security or
1168 integrity of nonpublic personal information and the licensee's
1169 information system.
1170 c. Protect against unauthorized access to or the use of
1171 nonpublic personal information and minimize the likelihood of
1172 harm to any customer.
1173 3. Define and periodically reevaluate the retention
1174 schedule and the mechanism for the destruction of nonpublic
1175 personal information if retention is no longer necessary for the
Page 47 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1176 licensee's business operations or is no longer required by
1177 applicable law.
1178 4. Regularly test and monitor systems and procedures for
1179 the detection of actual and attempted attacks on, or intrusions
1180 into, the licensee's information system.
1181 5. Be monitored, evaluated, and adjusted, as necessary, to
1182 meet all of the following requirements:
1183 a. Determine whether the licensee's information security
1184 program is consistent with relevant changes in technology.
1185 b. Confirm the licensee's information security program
1186 accounts for the sensitivity of nonpublic personal information.
1187 c. Identify changes that may be necessary to the
1188 licensee's information system.
1189 d. Eliminate any internal or external threats to nonpublic
1190 personal information.
1191 e. Amend the licensee's information security program for
1192 any of the licensee's changing business arrangements, including,
1193 but not limited to, mergers and acquisitions, alliances and
1194 joint ventures, and outsourcing arrangements.
1195 (c)1. As part of a licensee's information security
1196 program, the licensee shall establish a written incident
1197 response plan designed to promptly respond to, and recover from,
1198 a cybersecurity event that compromises:
1199 a. The confidentiality, integrity, or availability of
1200 nonpublic personal information in the licensee's possession;
Page 48 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1201 b. The licensee's information system; or
1202 c. The continuing functionality of any aspect of the
1203 licensee's operations.
1204 2. The written incident response plan must address all of
1205 the following:
1206 a. The licensee's internal process for responding to a
1207 cybersecurity event.
1208 b. The goals of the licensee's incident response plan.
1209 c. The assignment of clear roles, responsibilities, and
1210 levels of decisionmaking authority for the licensee's personnel
1211 that participate in the incident response plan.
1212 d. External communications, internal communications, and
1213 information sharing related to a cybersecurity event.
1214 e. The identification of remediation requirements for
1215 weaknesses identified in information systems and associated
1216 controls.
1217 f. The documentation and reporting regarding cybersecurity
1218 events and related incident response activities.
1219 g. The evaluation and revision of the incident response
1220 plan, as appropriate, following a cybersecurity event.
1221 h. The process by which notice must be given as required
1222 under subsection (4) and s. 501.171(3) and (4).
1223 (d)1. This section does not apply to a licensee that has
1224 fewer than:
1225 a. Twenty individuals on its workforce, including
Page 49 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1226 employees and independent contractors; or
1227 b. Five hundred customers during a calendar year.
1228 2. A licensee that no longer qualifies for exemption under
1229 subparagraph 1. has 180 calendar days to comply with this
1230 section after the date of the disqualification.
1231 (e) Each licensee shall maintain a copy of the information
1232 security program for a minimum of 5 years and shall make it
1233 available to the office upon request or as part of an
1234 examination.
1235 (3) CYBERSECURITY EVENT INVESTIGATION.—
1236 (a) If a licensee discovers that a cybersecurity event has
1237 occurred or that a cybersecurity event may have occurred, the
1238 licensee, or an outside vendor or third-party service provider
1239 that the licensee has designated to act on its behalf, shall
1240 conduct a prompt investigation of the cybersecurity event.
1241 (b) During the investigation, the licensee, or the outside
1242 vendor or third-party service provider that the licensee has
1243 designated to act on its behalf, shall, at a minimum, determine
1244 as much of the following as possible:
1245 1. Confirm that a cybersecurity event has occurred.
1246 2. Identify the date that the cybersecurity event first
1247 occurred.
1248 3. Assess the nature and scope of the cybersecurity event.
1249 4. Identify all nonpublic personal information that may
1250 have been compromised by the cybersecurity event.
Page 50 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1251 5. Perform or oversee reasonable measures to restore the
1252 security of any compromised information system in order to
1253 prevent further unauthorized acquisition, release, or use of
1254 nonpublic personal information that is in the licensee's,
1255 outside vendor's, or third-party service provider's possession,
1256 custody, or control.
1257 (c) If a licensee learns that a cybersecurity event has
1258 occurred, or may have occurred, in an information system
1259 maintained by a third-party service provider of the licensee,
1260 the licensee shall complete an investigation in compliance with
1261 this section or confirm and document that the third-party
1262 service provider has completed an investigation in compliance
1263 with this section.
1264 (d) A licensee shall maintain all records and
1265 documentation related to the licensee's investigation of a
1266 cybersecurity event for a minimum of 5 years after the date of
1267 the cybersecurity event and shall produce the records and
1268 documentation to the office upon request.
1269 (4) NOTICE TO OFFICE OF SECURITY BREACH.—
1270 (a) Each licensee shall provide notice to the office of
1271 any breach of security affecting 500 or more individuals in this
1272 state at a time and in the manner prescribed by commission rule.
1273 (b) Each licensee shall, upon the office's request,
1274 provide a quarterly update of a cybersecurity event
1275 investigation under subsection (3) until conclusion of the
Page 51 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1276 investigation.
1277 (5) CONSTRUCTION.—This section may not be construed to
1278 relieve a covered entity from complying with s. 501.171. To the
1279 extent a licensee is a covered entity, as defined in s.
1280 501.171(1), the licensee remains subject to s. 501.171.
1281 (6) RULES.—The commission may adopt rules to administer
1282 this section, including rules that allow a licensee that is in
1283 full compliance with the Federal Trade Commission's Standards
1284 for Safeguarding Customer Information, 16 C.F.R. part 314, to be
1285 deemed in compliance with subsection (2).
1286 Section 7. Section 655.0171, Florida Statutes, is created
1287 to read:
1288 655.0171 Requirements for customer data security and for
1289 notices of security breaches.—
1290 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
1291 (a) "Breach of security" or "breach" means unauthorized
1292 access of data in electronic form containing personal
1293 information. Good faith access of personal information by an
1294 employee or agent of a financial institution does not constitute
1295 a breach of security, provided that the information is not used
1296 for a purpose unrelated to the business or subject to further
1297 unauthorized use. As used in this paragraph, the term "data in
1298 electronic form" means any data stored electronically or
1299 digitally on any computer system or other database and includes
1300 recordable tapes and other mass storage devices.
Page 52 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1301 (b) "Department" means the Department of Legal Affairs.
1302 (c)1. "Personal information" means:
1303 a. An individual's first name, or first initial, and last
1304 name, in combination with any of the following data elements for
1305 that individual:
1306 (I) A social security number;
1307 (II) A driver license or identification card number,
1308 passport number, military identification number, or other
1309 similar number issued on a government document used to verify
1310 identity;
1311 (III) A financial account number or credit or debit card
1312 number, in combination with any required security code, access
1313 code, or password that is necessary to permit access to the
1314 individual's financial account;
1315 (IV) The individual's biometric data as defined in s.
1316 501.702; or
1317 (V) Any information regarding the individual's
1318 geolocation; or
1319 b. A username or e-mail address, in combination with a
1320 password or security question and answer that would permit
1321 access to an online account.
1322 2. The term does not include information about an
1323 individual which has been made publicly available by a federal,
1324 state, or local governmental entity. The term also does not
1325 include information that is encrypted, secured, or modified by
Page 53 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1326 any other method or technology that removes elements that
1327 personally identify an individual or that otherwise renders the
1328 information unusable.
1329 (2) REQUIREMENTS FOR DATA SECURITY.—Each financial
1330 institution shall take reasonable measures to protect and secure
1331 data that are in electronic form and that contain personal
1332 information.
1333 (3) NOTICE TO OFFICE AND DEPARTMENT OF SECURITY BREACH.—
1334 (a)1. Each financial institution shall provide notice to
1335 the office of any breach of security affecting 500 or more
1336 individuals in this state. Such notice must be provided to the
1337 office as expeditiously as practicable, but no later than 30
1338 days after the determination of the breach or the determination
1339 of a reason to believe that a breach has occurred.
1340 2. The written notice to the office must include the items
1341 required under s. 501.171(3)(b).
1342 3. A financial institution must provide the following
1343 information to the office upon its request:
1344 a. A police report, incident report, or computer forensics
1345 report.
1346 b. A copy of the policies in place regarding breaches.
1347 4. Steps that have been taken to rectify the breach.
1348 5. A financial institution may provide the office with
1349 supplemental information regarding a breach at any time.
1350 (b) Each financial institution shall provide notice to the
Page 54 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1351 department of any breach of security affecting 500 or more
1352 individuals in this state. Such notice must be provided to the
1353 department in accordance with s. 501.171.
1354 (4) NOTICE TO INDIVIDUALS OF SECURITY BREACH.—Each
1355 financial institution shall give notice to each individual in
1356 this state whose personal information was, or the financial
1357 institution reasonably believes to have been, accessed as a
1358 result of the breach in accordance with s. 501.171(4). The
1359 notice must be provided no later than 30 days after the
1360 determination of the breach or the determination of a reason to
1361 believe that a breach has occurred. A financial institution may
1362 receive 15 additional days to provide notice to individuals of a
1363 security breach as required in this subsection if good cause for
1364 delay is provided in writing to the office within 30 days after
1365 determination of the breach or determination of the reason to
1366 believe that a breach has occurred.
1367 (5) NOTICE TO CREDIT REPORTING AGENCIES.—If a financial
1368 institution discovers circumstances requiring notice pursuant to
1369 this section of more than 1,000 individuals at a single time,
1370 the financial institution shall also notify, without
1371 unreasonable delay, all consumer reporting agencies that compile
1372 and maintain files on consumers on a nationwide basis, as
1373 defined in the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. s. 1681a(p),
1374 of the timing, distribution, and content of the notices.
1375 Section 8. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
Page 55 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1376 655.045, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1377 655.045 Examinations, reports, and internal audits;
1378 penalty.—
1379 (1) The office shall conduct an examination of the
1380 condition of each state financial institution at least every 18
1381 months. The office may conduct more frequent examinations based
1382 upon the risk profile of the financial institution, prior
1383 examination results, or significant changes in the institution
1384 or its operations. The office may use continuous, phase, or
1385 other flexible scheduling examination methods for very large or
1386 complex state financial institutions and financial institutions
1387 owned or controlled by a multi-financial institution holding
1388 company. The office shall consider examination guidelines from
1389 federal regulatory agencies in order to facilitate, coordinate,
1390 and standardize examination processes.
1391 (d) As used in this section, the term "costs" means the
1392 salary and travel expenses directly attributable to the field
1393 staff examining the state financial institution, subsidiary, or
1394 service corporation, and the travel expenses of any supervisory
1395 staff required as a result of examination findings. The mailing
1396 of any costs incurred under this subsection must be postmarked
1397 within 45 30 days after the date of receipt of a notice stating
1398 that such costs are due. The office may levy a late payment of
1399 up to $100 per day or part thereof that a payment is overdue,
1400 unless excused for good cause. However, for intentional late
Page 56 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1401 payment of costs, the office may levy an administrative fine of
1402 up to $1,000 per day for each day the payment is overdue.
1403 Section 9. Subsection (2) of section 657.005, Florida
1404 Statutes, is amended to read:
1405 657.005 Application for authority to organize a credit
1406 union; investigation.—
1407 (2) Any five or more individuals, a majority of whom are
1408 residents of this state and all of whom who represent a limited
1409 field of membership, may apply to the office for permission to
1410 organize a credit union. The fact that individuals within the
1411 proposed limited field of membership have credit union services
1412 available to them through another limited field of membership
1413 shall not preclude the granting of a certificate of
1414 authorization to engage in the business of a credit union.
1415 Section 10. Subsection (1) of section 657.024, Florida
1416 Statutes, is amended to read:
1417 657.024 Membership meetings.—
1418 (1) The members shall receive timely notice of the annual
1419 meeting and any special meetings of the members, which shall be
1420 held at the time, place, and in the manner provided in the
1421 bylaws. The annual meeting and any special meetings of the
1422 members may be held virtually and without a quorum, subject to
1423 the bylaws.
1424 Section 11. Subsections (6) and (7) of section 657.042,
1425 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5) and (6), and
Page 57 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1426 paragraph (b) of subsection (3) and present subsection (5) of
1427 that section are amended to read:
1428 657.042 Investment powers and limitations.—A credit union
1429 may invest its funds subject to the following definitions,
1430 restrictions, and limitations:
1431 (3) INVESTMENT SUBJECT TO LIMITATION OF TWO PERCENT OF
1432 CAPITAL OF THE CREDIT UNION.—
1433 (b) Commercial paper and bonds of any corporation within
1434 the United States which have a fixed maturity, as provided in
1435 subsection (6) (7), except that the total investment in all such
1436 paper and bonds may not exceed 10 percent of the capital of the
1437 credit union.
1438 (5) INVESTMENTS IN REAL ESTATE AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE
1439 CREDIT UNION.—
1440 (a) Up to 5 percent of the capital of the credit union may
1441 be invested in real estate and improvements thereon, furniture,
1442 fixtures, and equipment utilized or to be utilized by the credit
1443 union for the transaction of business.
1444 (b) The limitations provided by this subsection may be
1445 exceeded with the prior written approval of the office. The
1446 office shall grant such approval if it is satisfied that:
1447 1. The proposed investment is necessary.
1448 2. The amount thereof is commensurate with the size and
1449 needs of the credit union.
1450 3. The investment will be beneficial to the members.
Page 58 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1451 4. A reasonable plan is developed to reduce the investment
1452 to statutory limits.
1453 Section 12. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (4) of
1454 section 658.21, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1455 658.21 Approval of application; findings required.—The
1456 office shall approve the application if it finds that:
1457 (4)
1458 (b) At least two of the proposed directors who are not
1459 also proposed officers must have had within the 10 years before
1460 the date of the application at least 1 year of direct experience
1461 as an executive officer, regulator, or director of a financial
1462 institution as specified in the application within the 5 years
1463 before the date of the application. However, if the applicant
1464 demonstrates that at least one of the proposed directors has
1465 very substantial experience as an executive officer, director,
1466 or regulator of a financial institution more than 5 years before
1467 the date of the application, the office may modify the
1468 requirement and allow the applicant to have only one director
1469 who has direct financial institution experience within the last
1470 5 years.
1471 (c) The proposed president or chief executive officer must
1472 have had at least 1 year of direct experience as an executive
1473 officer, director, or regulator of a financial institution
1474 within the last 10 5 years. In making a decision, the office
1475 must also consider may waive this requirement after considering:
Page 59 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1476 1. The adequacy of the overall experience and expertise of
1477 the proposed president or chief executive officer;
1478 2. The likelihood of successful operation of the proposed
1479 state bank or trust company pursuant to subsection (1);
1480 3. The adequacy of the proposed capitalization under
1481 subsection (2);
1482 4. The proposed capital structure under subsection (3);
1483 5. The experience of the other proposed officers and
1484 directors; and
1485 6. Any other relevant data or information.
1486 Section 13. Subsection (2) of section 658.33, Florida
1487 Statutes, is amended to read:
1488 658.33 Directors, number, qualifications; officers.—
1489 (2) Not less than a majority of the directors must, during
1490 their whole term of service, be citizens of the United States,
1491 and at least a majority of the directors must have resided in
1492 this state for at least 1 year preceding their election and must
1493 be residents therein during their continuance in office. In the
1494 case of a bank or trust company with total assets of less than
1495 $150 million, at least one, and in the case of a bank or trust
1496 company with total assets of $150 million or more, two of the
1497 directors who are not also officers of the bank or trust company
1498 must have had at least 1 year of direct experience as an
1499 executive officer, regulator, or director of a financial
1500 institution within the last 10 5 years.
Page 60 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1501 Section 14. Subsection (4) of section 662.141, Florida
1502 Statutes, is amended to read:
1503 662.141 Examination, investigations, and fees.—The office
1504 may conduct an examination or investigation of a licensed family
1505 trust company at any time it deems necessary to determine
1506 whether the licensed family trust company or licensed family
1507 trust company-affiliated party thereof has violated or is about
1508 to violate any provision of this chapter, any applicable
1509 provision of the financial institutions codes, or any rule
1510 adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter or the codes.
1511 The office may conduct an examination or investigation of a
1512 family trust company or foreign licensed family trust company at
1513 any time it deems necessary to determine whether the family
1514 trust company or foreign licensed family trust company has
1515 engaged in any act prohibited under s. 662.131 or s. 662.134
1516 and, if a family trust company or a foreign licensed family
1517 trust company has engaged in such act, to determine whether any
1518 applicable provision of the financial institutions codes has
1519 been violated.
1520 (4) For each examination of the books and records of a
1521 family trust company, licensed family trust company, or foreign
1522 licensed family trust company as authorized under this chapter,
1523 the trust company shall pay a fee for the costs of the
1524 examination by the office. As used in this section, the term
1525 "costs" means the salary and travel expenses of field staff
Page 61 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 381 2026
1526 which are directly attributable to the examination of the trust
1527 company and the travel expenses of any supervisory and support
1528 staff required as a result of examination findings. The mailing
1529 of payment for costs incurred must be postmarked within 45 30
1530 days after the receipt of a notice stating that the costs are
1531 due. The office may levy a late payment of up to $100 per day or
1532 part thereof that a payment is overdue unless waived for good
1533 cause. However, if the late payment of costs is intentional, the
1534 office may levy an administrative fine of up to $1,000 per day
1535 for each day the payment is overdue.
1536 Section 15. Subsection (21) of section 517.12, Florida
1537 Statutes, is amended to read:
1538 517.12 Registration of dealers, associated persons,
1539 intermediaries, and investment advisers.—
1540 (21) The registration requirements of this section do not
1541 apply to any general lines insurance agent or life insurance
1542 agent licensed under chapter 626, with regard to the sale of a
1543 security as defined in s. 517.021(34)(g) s. 517.021(33)(g), if
1544 the individual is directly authorized by the issuer to offer or
1545 sell the security on behalf of the issuer and the issuer is a
1546 federally chartered savings bank subject to regulation by the
1547 Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Actions under this
1548 subsection constitute activity under the insurance agent's
1549 license for purposes of ss. 626.611 and 626.621.
1550 Section 16. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 62 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb381-00